Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202381-703
Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund; created; use; investment.

The Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 77-27,132, transfers authorized by the Legislature, and any gifts, grants, bequests, or donations to the fund. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Transportation and shall be used to build, repair, renovate, rehabilitate, restore, modify, or improve any infrastructure at any public-use airport licensed by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 100.
June 7, 2023
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.